dev/verbs.dix
  <!-- peldēt; peld -->
    <pardef n="peld/ēt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēšu</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsim</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsi</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsit</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēsiet</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēs</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēt</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēju</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējām</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēji</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējāt</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēja</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ēt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- griezties; grie -->
    <pardef n="grie/zties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zīšos</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zīsimies</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zīsies</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zīsieties</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zīsities</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zīsies</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zties</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zos</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zāmies</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zies</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zāties</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zās</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žos</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žamies</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zies</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žaties</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žas</l>
          <r>zties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dēvēties; dēvē -->
    <pardef n="dēvē/ties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šos</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>simies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sities</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sieties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jāmies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jāties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jās</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jamies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jaties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="peldēt"><i>peld</i><par n="peld/ēt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="griezties"><i>grie</i><par n="grie/zties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dēvēties"><i>dēvē</i><par n="dēvē/ties__vblex"/></e>
